North Carolina, session 2025, HB705.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. No later than March 15, 2026, the Department of Public Instruction,
in collaboration with the State Board of Community Colleges, shall study and report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee on any identified recommendations on licensure
requirements for Career and Technical Education (CTE) high school teachers. The purposes of
the study are to (i) review current CTE licensure policy to determine if a different set of criteria
would qualify a credentialed skilled worker or professional to effectively teach students and (ii)
apply that criteria as an alternative path or as a modification to an existing path to CTE teacher
licensure. The report shall include at least the following information:
(1) The recommended criteria for a credentialed skilled worker or professional to
possess competency sufficient to teach students his or her subject matter,
including consideration of at least each of the following components:
a. The type of credentials that are sufficient or insufficient.
b. The number of years of experience necessary.
c. Any measure of breadth of experience or of competency that would
otherwise demonstrate expertise.
d. Any combination of the components in sub-subdivisions a. through c.
of this subdivision.
(2) In light of existing CTE licensure policies and procedures, recommendations
on how to best implement an alternative path or a modified path to licensure
for individuals who meet the criteria recommended by the study.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H705-v-1*